Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Deposit of Funds by Administrator

393A.450.
Deposit of funds by administrator.

The administrator shall deposit in the State Treasury all funds received under this chapter, including proceeds from the sale of property under KRS

393A.400

to

393A.440

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 45, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.460.
Administrator to retain records of property.

The administrator shall:

Record and retain the name and last-known address of each person shown on a report filed under KRS

393A.220

to be the apparent owner of property delivered to the administrator;

Record and retain the name and last-known address of each insured or annuitant and beneficiary shown on the report;

For each policy of insurance or annuity contract listed in the report of an insurance company, record and retain the policy or account number, the name of the company, and the amount due or paid; and

For each apparent owner listed in the report, record and retain the name of the holder that filed the report and the amount due or paid.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 46, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.470.
Expenses and service charges of administrator.

In addition to the expenses permitted under KRS

393.250

, the administrator may deduct:

Expenses of disposition of property delivered to the administrator under this chapter;

Costs of mailing and publication in connection with property delivered to the administrator under this chapter;

Reasonable service charges; and

Expenses incurred in examining records of or collecting property from a putative holder or holder.

In addition to any expenses in subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall deduct the proportionate costs of advertisement and operations from the amount of any claim allowed in an amount greater than ten dollars ($10). The administrator shall deduct at least one dollar ($1).

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 47, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.480.
Administrator holds property as custodian for owner.

Property received by the administrator under this chapter shall be held in custody for the benefit of the owner and shall not be owned by the state.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 48, effective July 14, 2018.